District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-1504

Certification to District Court upon plea of title; undertaking

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 560, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(g)(2)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1504.